Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2907
Approved laboratory, defined.

Approved laboratory means an animal disease diagnostic laboratory accredited by the American Association of Veterinary Laboratory Diagnosticians to conduct animal disease testing.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 7.